Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-404
Consolidation agreement; publication; availability.

When a consolidation agreement is submitted to the voters for approval, the county board of each county entering into a consolidation agreement shall cause a description of the proposed consolidation agreement to be published in its county prior to the election at least once a week for three consecutive weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county. Final publication in each county shall be within seven calendar days prior to the election pursuant to section 22-405. Each board shall make a copy of the agreement available for inspection at the county clerk's office. A person may obtain a copy of the agreement at no charge upon request at the county clerk's office.

Laws 1933, c. 34, § 4, p. 218;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 25-404;

R.S.1943, § 22-404;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 17.